Washington statutes.
RCW 39.89.050

Procedure for creating increment area.

Before adopting an ordinance creating the increment area, a local government must:

(1) Obtain written agreement for the use of community revitalization financing to finance all or a portion of the costs of the designated public improvements from taxing districts that, in the aggregate, levy at least seventy-five percent of the regular property tax on property within the increment area. A signed, written agreement from taxing districts that in the aggregate levy at least seventy-five percent of the regular property tax within the increment area, constitutes concurrence by all taxing districts in the increment area in the public improvement and participation in the public improvement to the extent of providing limited funding under community revitalization financing authorized under this chapter. The agreement must be authorized by the governing body of taxing districts that in the aggregate levy at least seventy-five percent of the regular property tax on property within the increment area;

(2) Hold a public hearing on the proposed financing of the public improvement in whole or in part with community revitalization financing. Notice of the public hearing must be published in a legal newspaper of general circulation within the proposed increment area at least ten days before the public hearing and posted in at least six conspicuous public places located in the proposed increment area. Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements, estimate the costs of the public improvements, describe the portion of the costs of the public improvements to be borne by community revitalization financing, describe any other sources of revenue to finance the public improvements, describe the boundaries of the proposed increment area, and estimate the period during which community revitalization financing is contemplated to be used. The public hearing may be held by either the governing body of the local government, or a committee of the governing body that includes at least a majority of the whole governing body; and

(3) Adopt an ordinance establishing the increment area that describes the public improvements, describes the boundaries of the increment area, estimates the cost of the public improvements and the portion of these costs to be financed by community revitalization financing, estimates the time during which regular property taxes are to be apportioned, provides the date when the apportionment of the regular property taxes will commence, and finds that the conditions of RCW 39.89.030 are met.

[ 2001 c 212 s 5.]